New York, session 2025-2026, A1971.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 2 section 210 of the tax law, as amended by section 1 of subpart A of part 3 I of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 For taxable years beginning before January first, two thousand 5 sixteen, the amount prescribed by this paragraph shall be computed at 6 the rate of seven and one-tenth percent of the taxpayer's business 7 income base. For taxable years beginning on or after January first, two 8 thousand sixteen, and before January first, two thousand twenty-six, the 9 amount prescribed by this paragraph shall be six and one-half percent of 10 the taxpayer's business income base. For taxable years beginning on or 11 after January first, two thousand twenty-six, the amount prescribed by 12 this paragraph shall be seven and one quarter percent of the taxpayer's 13 business income base; for any taxpayer with a business income base for 14 the taxable year in excess of five million dollars, the amount 15 prescribed by this paragraph shall be eleven and one-half percent of the 16 taxpayer's business income base. For taxable years beginning on or after 17 January first, two thousand twenty-one and before January first, two 18 thousand [twenty-seven] twenty-six for any taxpayer with a business EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01693-02-6 A. 1971--A 2 1 income base for the taxable year of more than five million dollars, the 2 amount prescribed by this paragraph shall be seven and one-quarter 3 percent of the taxpayer's business income base. The taxpayer's business 4 income base shall mean the portion of the taxpayer's business income 5 apportioned within the state as hereinafter provided. However, in the 6 case of a small business taxpayer, as defined in paragraph (f) of this 7 subdivision, the amount prescribed by this paragraph shall be computed 8 pursuant to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph and in the case of a 9 manufacturer, as defined in subparagraph (vi) of this paragraph, the 10 amount prescribed by this paragraph shall be computed pursuant to 11 subparagraph (vi) of this paragraph, and, in the case of a qualified 12 emerging technology company, as defined in subparagraph (vii) of this 13 paragraph, the amount prescribed by this paragraph shall be computed 14 pursuant to subparagraph (vii) of this paragraph. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 16 years commencing on and after such effective date.